en: Semi-fine gherkins
fr: Cornichons mi-fins

en: Sweet and sour gherkins, Gherkins in sweet and sour sauce
fr: Cornichons aigres-doux, Cornichon aigre-doux
hr: Kornišoni u slatko-kiselom umaku
nl: Zoetzure augurken

en: dill pickles
fr: Cornichons à l'aneth

en: Polish pickles
fr: Cornichons à la polonaise

en: Russian pickles
fr: Cornichons à la russe

en: Gherkins slices
fr: Cornichons en rondelles, Rondelles de cornichons, Tranches de cornichons, Cornichons en tranches, Cornichons tranchés, Cornichons en lamelles

en: Gherkins with espelette pepper
fr: Cornichons au piment d'espelette

en: Gherkins with onions
fr: Cornichons aux oignons

en: Pickled eggplants
es: Berenjenas encurtidas
fr: Aubergines marinées, aubergines à l'huile
hr: Kiseli patlidžani
ja: ナスのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte aubergines

en: Pickled garlic
de: Eingelegter Knoblauch
es: Ajos encurtidos
hr: Kiseli češnjak
hu: Pácolt foghagyma
ja: にんにくのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte knoflook

en: Pickled onions, Onions pickled in vinegar
es: Cebollas encurtidas, Cebollitas encurtidas
fr: Oignons au vinaigre
hr: Kiseli luk
it: Cipolle sottaceto
ja: 玉ねぎのピクルス, たまねぎのピクルス
nl: Ingemaakte uien

en: Pickled peppers
de: Eingelegte Peperoni
es: Pimientos encurtidos
fr: Poivrons au vinaigre
hr: Kisele paprike
nl: Ingemaakte pepertjes

en: Pickled guindilla peppers, Pickled guindilla chillis
es: Guindillas encurtidas
hr: Ukiseljena guindilla paprika
nl: Ingemaakte guindilla pepers

en: Pickled jalapeños
nl: Ingemaakte jalapeño peper
sv: Inlagda jalapeños

en: Pickled sliced jalapeños
sv: Inlagda skivade jalapeños

en: Pickled friggitelli
sv: Inlagta feferoni

en: Pickled Mushrooms, Mushrooms in oil
fr: Champignons marinés, Champignons à l'huile

en: Pickled cep mushrooms, cep mushrooms in oil
fr: Cèpes marinés, Cèpes à l'huile

en: Pickled chanterelles, chanterelles in oil, girolles in oil
fr: Chanterelles marinées, girolles à l'huile, chanterelles à l'huile

en: Pickled red cabbage, marinated red cabbage
fr: Chou rouge mariné, Choux rouges marinés